Hawaii statutes.
§269-109 Net electricity consumption or
production information. The electric utility shall provide every eligible
customer-generator with net electricity consumption or production information
with each regular monthly bill, which shall include:

(1) The current monetary balance owed the electric
utility for net electricity consumed;

(2) The net electricity produced since the end of the
last monthly billing period; and

(3) An accounting of the credits for excess
electricity produced by the eligible customer-generator since the last
twelve-month reconciliation period that shows credits applied to the monthly
billing period and the balance of unused credits, if any. [L 2001, c 272, pt of
§6; am L 2005, c 104, §9]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next